Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.077

Licensure requirements waiver for out-of-state and nationally certified applicants.

(1) Disciplining authorities shall waive education, training, experience, and exam requirements for applicants who have been credentialed in another state or states with substantially equivalent standards for at least two years immediately preceding their application with no interruption in licensure last longer than 90 days.

(2) Disciplining authorities may waive education, training, experience, or exam requirements for applicants who have achieved a national certification for the profession as determined by the disciplining authority in rule.

(3) Disciplining authorities may only issue credentials under this section to applicants who:

(a) Are not subject to denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under this chapter;

(b) Have not been subject to disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct or impairment in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction in the two years preceding their application or during the pendency of their application; and

(c) Are not under investigation or subject to charges in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction during the pendency of their application.

[ 2023 c 425 s 8.]